Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-660
Brain injury registry; liability for providing information; limitation.

No physician, psychologist, hospital, or administrator, officer, or employee of a hospital or medical professional who is in compliance with sections 81-657 and 81-663 to 81-675 shall be civilly or criminally liable for disclosing the information required under section 81-657.

Laws 1992, LB 308, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 123;

Laws 2006, LB 1178, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 39.